apertium-aii.aii.twoc
Alphabet

%[%-hab%]:0 %[%+hab%]:0
%[%-fut%]:0 %[%+fut%]:0

;

Rules

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
    except
      _ :* Fy:0 ;
    where Fx in ( %[%-hab%] %[%-fut%] %[%-obl%] )
        Fy in ( %[%+hab%] %[%+fut%] %[%+obl%] )
    matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
    Fx:0 /<= _ ;
       except
           Fy:0 :* _ ;
       where Fy in ( %[%-hab%] %[%-fut%] %[%-obl%] )
             Fx in ( %[%+hab%] %[%+fut%] %[%+obl%] )
    matched ;
